Maryland, session 2025, HB1362.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
12–104.
(a) The damages to be awarded for the taking of land [is its] ARE:
(1) THE fair market value OF THE LAND; AND
(2) ANY LEGAL, EXPERT, OR OTHER FEES OR COSTS OF THE
CONDEMNATION PROCEEDING INCURRED BY THE DEFENDANT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1362*

HOUSE BILL 1362
(b) The damages to be awarded where land, or any part of it, is taken is the fair
market value of the part taken, but not less than the actual value of the part taken plus
any severance or resulting damages to the remaining land by reason of the taking and of
future use by the plaintiff of the part taken. The severance or resulting damages shall be
diminished to the extent of the value of the special (particular) benefits to the remainder
arising from the plaintiff’s future use of the part taken.
(c) For the purpose of determining the extent of the taking and the valuation of
the tenant’s interest in a condemnation proceeding, no improvement or installation which
otherwise would be deemed part of the land shall be deemed personal property so as to be
excluded from the taking solely because of the private right of a tenant, as against the
owner of any other interest in the land sought to be condemned, to remove the improvement
or installation, unless the tenant exercises his right to remove it prior to the date when his
answer is due, or states in his answer his election to exercise this right.
(d) The damages to be awarded for the taking of a structure, such as a church or
place of religious worship, held in fee simple, or under a lease renewable forever, by or for
the benefit of a religious body and regularly used by the religious body, are the cost of
reproducing or replacing the improvements, adjusted for physical and functional
depreciation, to which shall be added the fair market value of the land.
(e) (1) The damages to be awarded for the taking of all land owned and
designated by a public body as park land, open space, or recreation area is the fair market
value as of the valuation date, of other land substantially similar in size and character and
of comparable quality for park, open space, or recreational purposes for the community
which made use of the land to be taken. No damages may be awarded unless other land is
acquired for park, open space, or recreational purposes. No awarded damages may be less
than the fair market value of the land to be taken.
(2) The damages to be awarded for the taking of part of the park land, open
space, or recreation area is the fair market value of the part taken, but not less than the
actual value of the replacement land as defined in paragraph (1) of this subsection plus any
severance or resulting damages to the remaining land by reason of the taking and of the
future use by the plaintiff of the part taken. The severance or resulting damages are to be
diminished to the extent of the value of the special (particular) benefits to the remainder
arising from the plaintiff’s future use of the land taken.
(3) Where the land, or any part of it, taken pursuant to this subsection
contains improvements, the damages to be awarded, in addition to that provided for in
paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, shall include the reasonable cost as of the
valuation date of providing new improvements of substantially the same size, comparable
character, and for the same purpose as those taken.
(f) The damages to be awarded for the taking of land or an interest in land over
which an easement in gross or other right to restrict its use has been granted pursuant to
§ 2–504 of the Agriculture Article shall be as provided for in this subsection and § 2–515 of
the Agriculture Article:

HOUSE BILL 1362 3
(1) The damages to be awarded for the taking of an entire tract is its fair
market value after deducting the lesser of (a) the value of the easement granted, or (b) the
excess of the aggregate amount of the property taxes that would have been due on the
property if the easement had not been granted above the aggregate amount of property
taxes actually paid on the property since the easement was granted.
(2) The damages to be awarded where part of a tract of land is taken is the
fair market value of the part taken less the deduction computed as described in paragraph
(1) of this subsection, but not less than the actual value of the part taken less the deduction
computed as described in paragraph (1) of this subsection, plus any severance or resulting
damages to the remaining land by reason of the taking and of future use by the plaintiff of
the part taken.
(g) If any easement in gross or other right to restrict use of land or any interest
in land has been donated to the Maryland Historical Trust or the Maryland Environmental
Trust, damages shall be awarded in any condemnation proceedings under this title to the
fee owner and leasehold owner, as their interests may appear, and shall be the fair market
value of the land or interest in it, computed as though the easement or other right did not
exist.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.